Washington statutes.
RCW 18.215.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Department" means the department of health.

(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

(3) "Surgical technologist" means a person, regardless of title, who is supervised in the surgical setting under the delegation of authority of a health care practitioner acting within the scope of his or her license and under the laws of this state.

[ 1999 c 335 s 2.]